Hawaii statutes.
§454F-18 Powers of commissioner. (a)
The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 as the commissioner
deems necessary for the administration of this chapter.

(b) In addition to any other powers provided
by law, the commissioner shall have the authority to:

(1) Administer and enforce the provisions and
requirements of this chapter;

(2) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules and issue
declaratory rulings or informal nonbinding interpretations;

(3) Develop requirements for licensure through rules,
including establishing the content of the written tests required under section
454F-7;

(4) Investigate and conduct hearings regarding any
violation of this chapter or any rule or order of, or agreement with, the
commissioner;

(5) Create fact-finding committees that may make
recommendations to the commissioner for the commissioner's deliberations;

(6) Require an applicant or any of its control
persons, officers, directors, employees, partners, members, managers, and
agents to disclose their relevant criminal history and request a criminal
history record check in accordance with chapter 846;

(7) Contract with or employ qualified persons,
including investigators, examiners, or auditors who may be exempt from chapter
76 and who shall assist the commissioner in exercising the commissioner's
powers and duties;

(8) Require that all fees, fines, and charges
collected by the commissioner under this chapter, except for fees designated
for deposit into the mortgage loan recovery fund pursuant to section 454F-41,
be deposited into the compliance resolution fund established pursuant to
section 26-9(o);

(9) Process and investigate complaints, subpoena
witnesses and documents, administer oaths, and receive affidavits and oral
testimony, including telephonic communications, and do any and all things
necessary or incidental to the exercise of the commissioner's power and duties,
including the authority to conduct contested case proceedings under chapter 91;
and

(10) Require a licensee to comply with any rule,
guidance, guideline, statement, supervisory policy or any similar proclamation
issued or adopted by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation to the same
extent and in the same manner as a bank chartered by the State or in the
alternative, any policy position of the Conference of State Bank Supervisors. [L
Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §23]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next